Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Unlawful Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy license renewal and continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 54 art. 3.

For physical therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 4.

For occupational therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 7.

Sec. 08.84.130.
False claim of license prohibited.

A person not licensed as a physical therapist, or whose license is suspended or revoked, or whose license is lapsed, who uses in connection with the person’s name the words or letters “L.P.T.”, “Licensed Physical Therapist,” or other letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a licensed physical therapist, or who in any way, orally, or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as a licensed physical therapist is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person not licensed as a physical therapy assistant, or whose license is suspended or revoked, or whose license is lapsed, who in any way, orally, or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as a licensed physical therapy assistant is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person not licensed as an occupational therapist, or whose license is suspended or revoked, or whose license is lapsed, who uses in connection with the person’s name the words “Licensed Occupational Therapist,” or other letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a licensed occupational therapist, or who orally or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as a licensed occupational therapist is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person not licensed as an occupational therapy assistant, or whose license is suspended or revoked, or whose license is lapsed, who orally or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as a licensed occupational therapy assistant is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 11 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 10 ch 71 SLA 1974; am § 12 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 46 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.84.140.
Penalty for fraud in obtaining license.

A person who wilfully makes a false oath or affirmation or who obtains or attempts to obtain a license by a fraudulent representation is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 13 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.84.150.
License required; exceptions.

It is unlawful for a person to practice physical therapy without being licensed under this chapter unless the person is

a student in an accredited physical therapy program;

a graduate of a foreign school of physical therapy fulfilling the internship requirement of AS

08.84.032

, and then only unless under the continuous direction and immediate supervision of a physical therapist; or

issued a limited permit under AS

08.84.075

.

A person may not provide services that the person describes as occupational therapy without being licensed under this chapter unless the person is

a student in an accredited occupational therapy program or in a supervised field work program;

a graduate of a foreign school of occupational therapy fulfilling the internship requirement of AS

08.84.032

, and then only unless under the continuous direction and immediate supervision of an occupational therapist;

an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant employed by the United States government while in the discharge of official duties;

granted a limited permit under AS

08.84.075

;

licensed under this title and uses occupational therapy skills in the practice of the profession for which the license is issued; or

employed as a teacher or teacher’s aide by an educational institution and is required to use occupational therapy skills during the course of employment, if

the occupational therapy skills are used under a program implemented by the employer and developed by a licensed occupational therapist;

the employer maintains direct supervision of the person’s use of occupational therapy skills; and

the person does not represent to

be an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant; and

practice occupational therapy.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 6 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 14 ch 55 SLA 1980; am §§ 19, 20 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For physical therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 4.

For occupational therapy standards of practice, see 12 AAC 54, art. 7.

Sec. 08.84.160.
Scope of authorized practice.

This chapter does not authorize a person to practice medicine, osteopathy, chiropractic, or other method of healing, but only to practice physical therapy or occupational therapy.

History.

(§ 13 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 7 ch 49 SLA 1969; am § 15 ch 55 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 46 SLA 1986; am § 21 ch 2 FSSLA 1987)

Sec. 08.84.170.
Penalty. [Repealed, § 7 ch 46 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 08.84.180.
Investigation.

The board shall request appropriate authorities to conduct investigations of every supposed violation of this chapter coming to its notice and shall report all cases that in the judgment of the board warrant prosecution to the proper law enforcement officials.

History.

(§ 17 ch 74 SLA 1957; am § 16 ch 55 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For investigative powers of Department of Commerce and Economic Development, see AS

08.01.087

.

Sec. 08.84.185.
Limits or conditions on license; discipline. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]